Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3906
Advisory council; consult with director.

The director may convene an advisory council of representatives of the insurance industry to consult with him or her on the approval and certification of continuing education activities.

Laws 1982, LB 274, § 6.